California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The role of a mandated reporter under the requirements of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1141, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1991.   Note: This section relates to the previous Article 3.2 (Greater Avenues for Independence Act of 1985), which was added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1025, and repealed Oct. 1, 1990, by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1568, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.2. Welfare-to-Work Activities  [11320. - 11329.5.]

11320.

Any reference to the Greater Avenues for Independence program or (GAIN) shall mean the welfare-to-work activities under the CalWORKs program provided for in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 61.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.1.

(a) Subsequent to the commencement of the receipt of aid under this chapter, the sequence of employment-related activities required of recipients under this article, unless exempted under Section 11320.3, shall be as follows:

(1) Orientation and appraisal.Recipients shall, and applicants may, at the option of a county and with the consent of the applicant,
 receive orientation to the welfare-to-work program provided under this article and receive appraisal pursuant to Section 11325.2.

(2) (A) After orientation and appraisal,
 if determined appropriate based on the appraisal, the county shall offer the recipient the opportunity to participate in
 family stabilization pursuant to Section 11325.24, and, if available, substance abuse, mental health, or domestic violence services. If not determined to be appropriate based on the appraisal, or if the county determines that proceeding to assessment pursuant to paragraph (3) would not interfere with those services, the recipient shall participate in the assessment.

(B) A recipient who has not received their high school diploma or its equivalent shall be offered a welfare-to-work plan pursuant to Section 11325.21 to participate in a high school education program or high school equivalency program, as described in Section 11325.3. If the recipient declines to participate in the educational activities described in this subparagraph, and to instead participate in
 assessment, as provided for in Section 11325.4, the recipient shall make that election in writing. Following assessment, the county and the recipient shall develop a welfare-to-work plan, as specified in Section 11325.21. The plan shall specify the activities provided for in Section 11322.6 to which the recipient shall be assigned, and the supportive services, as provided for pursuant to Section 11323.2, with which the recipient will be provided.

(3) Assessment.After orientation and appraisal, if not exempt pursuant to Section 11320.3, the recipient shall be referred to assessment, as provided for in Section 11325.4. Following assessment, the county and the recipient shall develop a welfare-to-work plan, as specified in Section 11325.21. The plan shall specify the activities provided for in
 Section 11322.6 to which the recipient shall be assigned, and the supportive services, as provided for pursuant to Section 11323.2, with which the recipient will be provided.

(4) Work activities.A recipient who has signed a welfare-to-work plan pursuant to Section 11325.21 shall participate in work activities, as described in this article.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, as added by the act that added this subdivision, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 8.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.1.

(a) Subsequent to the commencement of the receipt of aid under this chapter, the sequence of activities of counties and recipients under this article, unless exempted under Section 11320.3, shall be as follows:

(1) (A) Orientation and appraisal. The county shall provide recipients with a combined appraisal and an orientation to the welfare-to-work program provided under this article, unless the recipient has attended an appraisal in the past 12 months.

(B) The county shall provide the recipient with a blank simplified appraisal form, as set forth in Section 11325.15, and an online link to the form that the individual can return in person, by mail, or electronically. The
 appraisal shall gather and provide information about the applicant in all of the following areas:

(i) Housing status and stability.

(ii) Language barriers.

(iii) Physical and behavioral health, including mental health and substance abuse issues.

(iv) Child physical and behavioral health and well-being.

(v) Criminal background that may present a barrier to employment or housing stability.

(vi) The individual’s assessment of their skills, prior work experience, and employability. The individual may indicate they would like assistance with this assessment.

(vii) Need for supportive services, as described in Section 11323.2.

(viii) Any other barrier the individual chooses to identify.

(C) Orientation shall include all of the following:

(i) A review of the full range of the welfare-to-work activities described in Section 11322.6 and supportive services described in Section 11323.2.

(ii) Information on the bases for exemption described in Section 11320.3, how to request an exemption, and the opportunity to participate and receive supportive services as an exempt volunteer.

(iii) An offer to be screened and evaluated for a learning disability.

(iv) Information regarding
 the ability to request barrier removal services and referrals at any time.

(v) Provision of a welfare-to-work plan, as described in Section 11325.21, and information on alternative ways to submit the plan, including electronically. The recipient may attend orientation in person, by telephone, or by any alternative mode the county has available that the recipient chooses.

(vi) The county shall ask if the recipient has a physical, mental, or emotional circumstance that would interfere with their participation in welfare-to-work activities. If the recipient discloses a barrier, the county shall review the recipient’s case for and provide exemptions pursuant to Section 11320.3 and offer services to assist with barrier removal.

(D) Pursuant to Section 11325.15, the department shall develop a standardized statewide
 orientation and appraisal, in consultation with stakeholders. Counties may add county-specific information to the standardized orientation.

(2) Initial engagement activities may include other activities, if eligible, such as family stabilization pursuant to Section 11325.24, or substance abuse, mental health, or domestic violence services.

(3) Create welfare-to-work plan. After completing orientation and appraisal, the participant may complete and return the welfare-to-work plan to the county.

(4) (A) Assessment and welfare-to-work plan development.

(B) If a recipient has not either completed a simplified appraisal or a welfare-to-work plan within 45 days of being approved for aid, or if a recipient has requested county assistance, as described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 11325.2, the county shall set an appointment, which may include an assessment to collaboratively develop the plan, as described in Section 11325.4. The notice to the recipient of the appointment shall include a blank welfare-to-work plan, as described in Section 11325.21, and information on alternative ways to submit the plan. The assessment shall be conducted in person, by telephone, or by any alternative mode the county has available that the recipient chooses.

(C) The plan development appointment may be in person, by telephone, or by any
 alternative mode the county has available that the recipient chooses. The recipient may complete and return a welfare-to-work plan in lieu of attending the appointment. The plan, as set forth in Section 11325.21, shall be developed within 90 days of approval of aid.

(5) Work activities. At the completion of the welfare-to-work plan development, the recipient shall sign the plan in person, or by any alternative mode of providing a signature, as available in the county, including, but not limited to, electronic, telephonic, and oral attestation. A recipient who has signed a welfare-to-work plan described in Section 11325.21 shall participate in work activities, as described in this article.

(6) The county shall regularly review the welfare-to-work plan with the participant to ensure that the plan accurately reflects the current services and participation activities the county feels
 are best suited to support their well-being. During times that the county has personal contacts with the participant, or during other outreach efforts made by the county, the county shall offer to review the welfare-to-work activities. If those contacts or other outreach efforts have not occurred, and no other plan adjustments have been made to the plan within the past six months, the county shall send the participant a written notice along with their current plan and information on how to contact the county to make any plan adjustments.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar
 instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 9) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.15.

(a) After a participant has been removed from the assistance unit pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11454, additional welfare-to-work services may be provided to the recipient, at the option of the county. If the county provides services to the recipient after the 48-month limit has been reached, the recipient shall participate in community service or subsidized employment, as described in Section 11322.64.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11320.15, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 43.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.15.

(a) After a participant has been removed from the assistance unit pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11454, additional welfare-to-work services may be provided to the recipient, at the option of the county. If the county provides services to the recipient after the 60-month limit has been reached, the recipient shall participate in community service or subsidized employment, as described in Section 11322.64.

(b) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 44.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.16.

Employment services may be provided to a noncustodial parent of a child receiving benefits under the CalWORKs program, at the option of the county, from the county’s CalWORKs single allocation funds described in Section 15204.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 355, Sec. 2.   (SB 282)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.3.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or if otherwise exempt, every individual, as a condition of eligibility for aid under this chapter, shall participate in welfare-to-work activities under this article.

(2) Individuals eligible under Section 11331.5 shall be required to participate in the Cal-Learn Program under Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) in lieu of the welfare-to-work requirements, and subdivision (b) shall not apply to that individual.

(b) The following individuals shall not be required to participate for so long as the condition continues to exist:

(1) An individual under 16 years of age.

(2) (A) A child attending an elementary, secondary, vocational, or technical school on a full-time basis.

(B) A person who is 16 or 17 years of age who has obtained a high school diploma or its equivalent and is enrolled or is planning to enroll in a postsecondary education, vocational, or technical school training program shall not be required to participate for so long as the condition continues to exist.

(C) For purposes of subparagraph (B), a person shall be deemed to be planning to enroll in a postsecondary education, vocational, or technical school training program if the person or the person’s parent,
 acting on the person’s behalf, submits a written statement expressing the person’s intent to enroll in a program for the following term. The exemption from participation shall not
 continue beyond the beginning of the term, unless verification of enrollment is provided or obtained by the county.

(3) An individual who meets either of the following conditions:

(A) The individual is disabled as determined by a doctor’s verification that the disability is expected to last at least 30 days and that it significantly impairs the recipient’s ability to be regularly employed or participate in welfare-to-work activities, provided that the individual is actively seeking appropriate medical treatment.

(B) The individual is of advanced age.

(4) A nonparent caretaker relative who has primary responsibility for providing care for a child and
 is either caring for a child who is a dependent or ward of the court or caring for a child in a case in which a county determines the child is at risk of placement in foster care, and the county determines that the caretaking responsibilities are beyond those considered normal day-to-day parenting responsibilities such that they impair the caretaker relative’s ability to be regularly employed or to participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(5) An individual whose presence in the home is required because of illness or incapacity of another member of the household and whose caretaking responsibilities impair the recipient’s ability to be regularly employed or to participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(6) A parent or other relative who meets the criteria in subparagraph
 (A) or (B).

(A) (i) The parent or other relative has primary responsibility for personally providing care to a child six months of age or under, except that, on a case-by-case basis, and based on criteria developed by the county, this period may be reduced to the first 12 weeks after the birth or adoption of the child, or increased to the first 12 months after the birth or adoption of the child. An individual may be exempt only once under this clause.

(ii) An individual that received an exemption pursuant to clause (i) shall be exempt for a period of 12 weeks, upon the birth or adoption of any subsequent children, except that this period may be extended on a case-by-case basis to six months, based on criteria developed by the county.

(iii) In making the determination to extend the period of exception under clause (i) or (ii), the following may be considered:

(I) The availability of childcare.

(II) Local labor market conditions.

(III) Other factors determined by the county.

(iv) Effective January 1, 2013, the parent or other relative has primary responsibility for personally providing care to one child from birth to 23 months, inclusive. The exemption provided for under this clause shall be available in addition to any other exemption provided for under this subparagraph. An individual may be exempt only once under this clause.

(B) In a family eligible for aid under this chapter due to the unemployment of the principal wage earner, the exemption criteria contained in subparagraph (A) shall be applied to only one parent.

(7) A recipient who is pregnant. A pregnant recipient may
 volunteer to participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(c) An individual not required to participate may choose to participate voluntarily under this article, and end that participation at any time without loss of eligibility for aid under this chapter, if the individual’s status has not changed in a way that would require participation.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a custodial parent who is under 20 years of age and who has not earned a high school diploma or its equivalent, and who is not exempt, or deferred, as described in Section 11332, or whose only basis
 for exemption is paragraph (1), (2), (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (b), shall be required to participate solely for the purpose of earning a high school diploma or its equivalent. During the time that Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) is operative, this subdivision shall only apply to a custodial parent who is 19 years of age. Participating, exempt, or deferred custodial parents shall remain eligible to receive case management and supportive services, if available, and are not subject to sanctions.

(2) Section 11325.25 shall apply to a custodial parent who is 18 or 19 years
 of age and who is required to participate under this article.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the county may determine that participation in education activities for the purpose of earning a high school diploma or equivalent is inappropriate for a custodial parent who is 18 or 19 years of age only if that parent is reassigned pursuant to an evaluation under Section 11325.25, or, at appraisal is already in an educational or vocational training program that is approvable as a self-initiated program as specified in Section 11325.23. If that determination is
 made, the parent shall be allowed to continue participation in the self-initiated program subject to Section 11325.23. During the time that Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) is operative, this subdivision shall only apply to a custodial parent who is 19 years of age.

(f) A recipient shall be excused from participation for good cause when the county has determined there is a condition or other circumstance that temporarily prevents or significantly impairs the recipient’s ability to be regularly employed or to participate in welfare-to-work activities. The county human services agency shall review the good cause determination for its continuing appropriateness in accordance with the projected length of the condition, or circumstance, but not less than every three months. The recipient shall cooperate with the county
 human services agency and provide information, including written documentation, as required to complete the review. Conditions that may be considered good cause include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Lack of necessary supportive services.

(2) In accordance with Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 11495), the applicant or recipient is a victim of domestic violence, but only if participation under this article is detrimental to or unfairly penalizes that individual or their family.

(3) Licensed or license-exempt childcare for a child 10 years of age or younger is not reasonably available during the individual’s hours of training or employment including commuting time, or arrangements for childcare have broken
 down or have been interrupted, or childcare is needed for a child who meets the criteria of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11323.2, but who is not included in the assistance unit. For purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable availability” means childcare that is commonly available in the recipient’s community to a person who is not receiving aid and that is in conformity with the requirements of Public Law 104-193. The choices of childcare shall meet either licensing requirements or the requirements of Section 11324. This good cause criterion shall include the unavailability of suitable special needs childcare for children with identified special needs, including, but not limited to, disabilities or chronic illnesses.

(4) Denial of reasonable accommodations for pregnant or parenting students in
 violation of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 615, Sec. 2.   (SB 521)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.31.

(a) Sanctions shall not be applied for a failure or refusal to comply with program requirements for reasons related to employment, an offer of employment, an activity, or other training for employment, including, but not limited to, the following reasons:

(1) The employment, offer of employment, activity, or other training for employment discriminates on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(2) The employment or offer of employment exceeds the daily or weekly hours of work customary to the occupation, the
 recipient provides documentation to the county human services agency that the anticipated hours would be so unpredictable for that specific recipient that they would not allow the recipient to anticipate compliance with program requirements related to the job, or the recipient provides documentation to the county human services agency that the scheduled hours exhibit a pattern of unpredictability for that specific recipient that does not allow the recipient to anticipate compliance with program requirements related to the job.

(3) The employment, offer of employment, activity, or other training for employment requires travel to and from the place of employment, activity, or other training and a recipient’s home that exceeds a total of two hours in round trip time, exclusive of the time necessary to transport family members to a school or place providing care, or, if walking is the only available means of transportation, the round trip is more
 than two miles, exclusive of the mileage necessary to accompany family members to a school or a place providing care. A recipient who fails or refuses to comply with the program requirements based on this paragraph shall be required to participate in community service activities pursuant to Section 11322.9.

(4) The employment, offer of employment, activity, or other training for employment involves conditions that are in violation of applicable health and safety standards.

(5) The employment, offer of employment, or work activity does not provide for workers’ compensation insurance.

(6) Accepting the employment or work activity would cause an interruption in an approved education or job training program in progress that would otherwise lead to employment and sufficient income to be self-supporting, excluding work
 experience or community service employment as described in subdivisions (d) and (j) of Section 11322.6 and Section 11322.9 or other community work experience assignments, except that a recipient may be required to engage in welfare-to-work activities to the extent necessary to meet the hours of participation required by Section 11322.8.

(7) Accepting the employment, offer of employment, or work activity would cause the recipient to violate the terms of the recipient’s union membership.

(8) The recipient states that the employment or offer of employment fails to comply with the Healthy Workplaces, Healthy Families Act of 2014 (Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 245) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Labor Code).

(9) The recipient states that the recipient experienced sexual harassment or other abusive
 conduct at the workplace. For purposes of this section, “abusive conduct” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 12950.1 of the Government Code.

(10) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Wage Theft Prevention Act of 2011 were violated.

(11) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Domestic Worker Bill of Rights (Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 1450) of Division 2 of the Labor Code) were violated.

(12) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the CROWN Act (Section 212.1 of the Education Code and subdivisions (w) and (x) of Section 12926 of the Government Code) were violated.

(13) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the California Family
 Rights Act (Section 12945.2 of the Government Code) were violated.

(14) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Garment Worker Protection Act were violated (Sections 1174.1, 2670, 2671, 2673, 2673.1, 2673.2, and 2675.5 of the Labor Code) were violated.

(15) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Fair Chance Act (Section 12952 of the Government Code) or Section 432.7 of the Labor Code were violated.

(16) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Gender Nondiscrimination Act, as contained in Sections 12926, 12940, 12949, and 12955 of the Government Code, were violated.

(17) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under Section 432.6 of the Labor Code were violated.

(18) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under Section 12945.8 of the Government Code were violated.

(19) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Family-School Partnership Act (Section 230.8 of the Labor Code) were violated.

(20) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights to lactation accommodations were violated under Section 1031, 1032, 1033, or 1034 of the Labor Code.

(21) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under any federal, state, or local labor or employment law were violated.

(22) The recipient requires pregnancy- or parenting-related accommodations covered under Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec.
 1681 et seq.), or Section 66252, 66271.9, or 66281.7 of the Education Code, including, but not limited to, excused absences to attend child medical appointments, and has not received adequate accommodations.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), verification of the recipient’s statement is not required. The recipient need not reference any specific law in stating that their rights were violated.

(c) Relief from a program sanction provided pursuant to this section shall last no longer than three months from the first date of the failure or refusal to comply with program requirements.

(d) If an applicant or recipient reports refusing any offer of employment, reducing hours, voluntarily quitting any employment, or being discharged from any employment, the county human services agency shall provide the applicant or
 recipient with information regarding workplace rights generally, including information about how to file complaints with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement and the Civil Rights Department. The State Department of Social Services shall convene a stakeholder workgroup to develop instructions for county human services agencies on how to best inform applicants and recipients of their workplace rights and available remedies, and how to document an applicant’s or recipient’s statement of circumstances as required by this section. The stakeholder workgroup may be convened concurrently with an existing department stakeholder meeting. The stakeholder workgroup shall include, but is not limited to, representatives of organizations representing all of the following: County Welfare Directors Association of California, CalWORKs recipients, workers’ rights advocates, CalWORKs advocates, social workers, and any relevant state, county, or city government agencies. A county human services agency shall follow the
 instructions developed by the stakeholder workgroup.

(e) County human services agencies shall not be required or expected to provide any legal advice to recipients. Any information or materials provided to a recipient regarding workplace rights, including those developed and provided pursuant to subdivision (d), is not intended to be legal advice.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on October 1, 2024, or when the State Department of Social Services notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11320.31, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 615, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 967, Sec. 8.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on or after October 1, 2024, by its own provisions.    Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.31.

(a) Sanctions shall not be applied for a failure or refusal to comply with program requirements for reasons related to employment, an offer of employment, an activity, or other training for employment, including, but not limited to, the following reasons:

(1) The employment, offer of employment, activity, or other training for employment discriminates on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(2) The employment or offer of employment exceeds the daily or weekly hours of work customary to the occupation, the
 recipient provides documentation to the county human services agency that the anticipated hours would be so unpredictable for that specific recipient that they would not allow the recipient to anticipate compliance with program requirements related to the job, or the recipient provides documentation to the county human services agency that the scheduled hours exhibit a pattern of unpredictability for that specific recipient that does not allow the recipient to anticipate compliance with program requirements related to the job.

(3) The employment, offer of employment, activity, or other training for employment requires travel to and from the place of employment, activity, or other training and a recipient’s home that exceeds a total of two hours in round trip time, exclusive of the time necessary to transport family members to a school or place providing care, or, if walking is the only available means of transportation, the round trip is more
 than two miles, exclusive of the mileage necessary to accompany family members to a school or a place providing care. A recipient who fails or refuses to comply with the program requirements based on this paragraph shall be required to participate in community service activities pursuant to Section 11322.9.

(4) The employment, offer of employment, activity, or other training for employment involves conditions that are in violation of applicable health and safety standards.

(5) The employment, offer of employment, or work activity does not provide for workers’ compensation insurance.

(6) Accepting the employment or work activity would cause an interruption in an approved education or job training program in progress that would otherwise lead to employment and sufficient income to be self-supporting, excluding work
 experience or community service employment as described in subdivisions (d) and (j) of Section 11322.6 and Section 11322.9 or other community work experience assignments, except that a recipient may be required to engage in welfare-to-work activities to the extent necessary to meet the hours of participation required by Section 11322.8.

(7) Accepting the employment, offer of employment, or work activity would cause the recipient to violate the terms of the recipient’s union membership.

(8) The recipient states that the employment or offer of employment fails to comply with the Healthy Workplaces, Healthy Families Act of 2014 (Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 245) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Labor Code).

(9) The recipient states that the recipient experienced sexual harassment or other abusive
 conduct at the workplace. For purposes of this section, “abusive conduct” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 12950.1 of the Government Code.

(10) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Wage Theft Prevention Act of 2011 were violated.

(11) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Domestic Worker Bill of Rights (Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 1450) of Division 2 of the Labor Code) were violated.

(12) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the CROWN Act (Section 212.1 of the Education Code and subdivisions (w) and (x) of Section 12926 of the Government Code) were violated.

(13) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the California Family
 Rights Act (Section 12945.2 of the Government Code) were violated.

(14) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Garment Worker Protection Act were violated (Sections 1174.1, 2670, 2671, 2673, 2673.1, 2673.2, and 2675.5 of the Labor Code) were violated.

(15) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Fair Chance Act (Section 12952 of the Government Code) or Section 432.7 of the Labor Code were violated.

(16) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Gender Nondiscrimination Act, as contained in Sections 12926, 12940, 12949, and 12955 of the Government Code, were violated.

(17) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under Section 432.6 of the Labor Code were violated.

(18) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under Section 12945.8 of the Government Code were violated.

(19) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under the Family-School Partnership Act (Section 230.8 of the Labor Code) were violated.

(20) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights to lactation accommodations were violated under Section 1031, 1032, 1033, or 1034 of the Labor Code.

(21) The recipient states that the recipient’s rights under any federal, state, or local labor or employment law were violated.

(22) The recipient requires pregnancy- or parenting-related accommodations covered under Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec.
 1681 et seq.), or Section 66252, 66271.9, or 66281.7 of the Education Code, including, but not limited to, excused absences to attend child medical appointments, and has not received adequate accommodations.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), verification of the recipient’s statement is not required. The recipient need not reference any specific law in stating that their rights were violated.

(c) Relief from a program sanction provided pursuant to this section shall last no longer than three months from the first date of the failure or refusal to comply with program requirements.

(d) (1) If an applicant or recipient reports refusing any offer of employment, reducing hours, voluntarily quitting any employment, or being discharged from any employment, the county human services agency shall
 provide the applicant or recipient with information regarding workplace rights generally, including information about how to file complaints with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement and the Civil Rights Department. The State Department of Social Services shall convene a stakeholder workgroup to develop instructions for county human services agencies on how to best inform applicants and recipients of their workplace rights and available remedies, and how to document an applicant’s or recipient’s statement of circumstances as required by this section. The stakeholder workgroup may be convened concurrently with an existing department stakeholder meeting. The stakeholder workgroup shall include, but is not limited to, representatives of organizations representing all of the following: County Welfare Directors Association of California, CalWORKs recipients, workers’ rights advocates, CalWORKs advocates, social workers, and any relevant state, county, or city government agencies. A county human services
 agency shall follow the instructions developed by the stakeholder workgroup.

(2) The State Department of Social Services, along with the stakeholder workgroup, shall also develop instructions for county human services agencies on how best to issue an updated guidance to applicants and recipients of applicable rights under the California Family Rights Act (Section 12945.2 of the Government Code) and other new rights under federal, state, or local laws.

(e) County human services agencies shall not be required or expected to provide any legal advice to recipients. Any information or materials provided to a recipient regarding workplace rights, including those developed and provided pursuant to subdivision (d), is not intended to be legal advice.

(f) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2024, or when the
 State Department of Social Services notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever is later.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 615, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 967, Sec. 9.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after October 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.32.
